West Virginia, session 2026, HB5033.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 3. RULE MAKING. §29A-3-21. Pro-growth regulatory reform act (a) Notwithstanding any other law, if a proposed rule is estimated to increase regulatory costs in this state by more than $500,000 within five years after implementation, the proposed rule may not become effective until the legislature enacts legislation ratifying the proposed rule. (b) The agency shall submit the proposed rule to the Legislative Rule-making Review Committee no later than 30 days before the next regular legislative session. The committee must submit the proposed rule to the legislature as soon as practicable. (c) Any member of the legislature may introduce legislation to ratify the proposed rule. (d) The agency may not file a final rule with the secretary of state before obtaining legislative approval of the rule through legislation ratifying the proposed rule. If the legislature does not enact legislation to ratify the proposed rule during the current legislative session, the agency shall terminate the proposed rulemaking by publishing a notice of termination in the register. (e) This section does not apply to emergency rules adopted pursuant to §29A-3-15 of this code.  (f) Beginning on the effective date of this section, a rule prescribed by subsection (a) of this section is void.